New York, session 2025-2026, S10602.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The tax law is amended by adding a new section 1202-ooo to 2 read as follows: 3 § 1202-ooo. Hotel or motel taxes in the city of Glen Cove. (1) a. 4 Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary, the city of 5 Glen Cove, Nassau county, is hereby authorized and empowered to adopt 6 and amend local laws imposing in such city a tax, in addition to any 7 other tax authorized and imposed pursuant to this article such as the 8 legislature has or would have the power and authority to impose upon 9 persons occupying hotel or motel rooms in such city. For the purposes of 10 this section, the term "hotel" or "motel" shall mean and include any 11 facility providing lodging on an overnight basis and shall include those 12 facilities designated and commonly known as "bed and breakfast" and 13 "tourist" facilities, including boarding houses, inns, cottages and 14 clubs. 15 b. The rates of such tax shall not exceed four percent of the per diem 16 rental rate for each room, provided however, that such tax shall not be 17 applicable to a permanent resident of a hotel or motel. For the purposes 18 of this section, the term "permanent resident" shall mean a person occu- 19 pying any room or rooms in a hotel or motel for at least thirty consec- 20 utive days. 21 (2) Such tax may be collected and administered by the chief fiscal 22 officer of the city of Glen Cove by such means and in such manner as 23 other taxes which are now collected and administered by such officer or 24 as otherwise may be provided by such local law. 25 (3) Such local laws may provide that any tax imposed shall be paid by 26 the person liable therefor to the owner of the hotel or motel room occu- 27 pied or to the person entitled to be paid the rent or charge for the EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15484-02-6 S. 10602 2 1 hotel or motel room occupied for and on account of the city of Glen Cove 2 imposing the tax and that such owner or person entitled to be paid the 3 rent or charge shall be liable for the collection and payment of the 4 tax; and that such owner or person entitled to be paid the rent or 5 charge shall have the same right in respect to collecting the tax from 6 the person occupying the hotel or motel room, or in respect to nonpay- 7 ment of the tax by the person occupying the hotel or motel room, as if 8 the tax were a part of the rent or charge and payable at the same time 9 as the rent or charge; provided, however, that the chief fiscal officer 10 of the city, specified in such local law, shall be joined as a party in 11 any action or proceeding brought to collect the tax by the owner or by 12 the person entitled to be paid the rent or charge. 13 (4) Such local laws may provide for the filing of returns and the 14 payment of the tax on a monthly basis or on the basis of any longer or 15 shorter period of time. 16 (5) This section shall not authorize the imposition of such tax upon 17 any transaction, by or with any of the following in accordance with 18 section twelve hundred thirty of this article: 19 a. The state of New York, or any public corporation (including a 20 public corporation created pursuant to agreement or compact with another 21 state or the Dominion of Canada), improvement district or other poli- 22 tical subdivision of the state; 23 b. The United States of America, insofar as it is immune from taxa- 24 tion; 25 c. Any corporation or association, or trust, or community chest, fund 26 or foundation organized and operated exclusively for religious, charita- 27 ble or educational purposes, or for the prevention of cruelty to chil- 28 dren or animals, and no part of the net earnings of which inures to the 29 benefit of any private shareholder or individual and no substantial part 30 of the activities of which is carrying on propaganda, or otherwise 31 attempting to influence legislation; provided, however, that nothing in 32 this paragraph shall include an organization operated for the primary 33 purpose of carrying on a trade or business for profit, whether or not 34 all of its profits are payable to one or more organizations described in 35 this paragraph. 36 (6) Any final determination of the amount of any tax payable pursuant 37 to this section shall be reviewable for error, illegality or unconstitu- 38 tionality or any other reason whatsoever by a proceeding under article 39 seventy-eight of the civil practice law and rules if application there- 40 for is made to the supreme court within thirty days after the giving of 41 the notice of such final determination, provided, however, that any such 42 proceeding under article seventy-eight of the civil practice law and 43 rules shall not be instituted unless: 44 a. The amount of any tax sought to be reviewed, with such interest and 45 penalties thereon as may be provided for by local law or regulation 46 shall be first deposited and there is filed an undertaking, issued by a 47 surety company authorized to transact business in this state and 48 approved by the superintendent of financial services of this state as to 49 solvency and responsibility, in such amount as a justice of the supreme 50 court shall approve to the effect that if such proceeding be dismissed 51 or the tax confirmed the petitioner will pay all costs and charges which 52 may accrue in the prosecution of such proceeding; or 53 b. At the option of the petitioner such undertaking may be in a sum 54 sufficient to cover the taxes, interests and penalties stated in such 55 determination plus the costs and charges which may accrue against it in 56 the prosecution of the proceeding, in which event the petitioner shall S. 10602 3 1 not be required to pay such taxes, interest or penalties as a condition 2 precedent to the application. 3 (7) Where any tax imposed pursuant to this section shall have been 4 erroneously, illegally or unconstitutionally collected and application 5 for the refund thereof duly made to the proper fiscal officer or offi- 6 cers, and such officer or officers shall have made a determination deny- 7 ing such refund, such determination shall be reviewable by a proceeding 8 under article seventy-eight of the civil practice law and rules, 9 provided, however, that such proceeding is instituted within thirty days 10 after the giving of the notice of such denial, that a final determi- 11 nation of tax due was not previously made, and that an undertaking is 12 filed with the proper fiscal officer or officers in such amount and with 13 such sureties as a justice of the supreme court shall approve to the 14 effect that if such proceeding be dismissed or the tax confirmed, the 15 petitioner will pay all costs and charges which may accrue in the prose- 16 cution of such proceeding. 17 (8) Except in the case of a willfully false or fraudulent return with 18 intent to evade the tax, no assessment of additional tax shall be made 19 after the expiration of more than three years from the date of the 20 filing of a return, provided, however, that where no return has been 21 filed as provided by law the tax may be assessed at any time. 22 (9) All revenues resulting from the imposition of the tax under the 23 local laws shall be paid into the treasury of the city of Glen Cove and 24 shall be credited to and deposited in the general fund of the city. Such 25 revenues may be used for any lawful purpose. 26 (10) If any provision of this section or the application thereof to 27 any person or circumstance shall be held invalid, the remainder of this 28 section and the application of such provision to other persons or 29 circumstances shall not be affected thereby. 30 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.